Washington statutes.
RCW 35.01.020

Second-class city.

A second-class city is a city with a population of fifteen hundred or more at the time of its organization or reorganization that does not have a charter adopted under Article XI, section 10, of the state Constitution, and does not operate under Title 35A RCW.

[ 1997 c 361 s 9; 1994 c 81 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.01.020. Prior: 1955 c 319 s 3; prior: (i) 1890 p 140 s 11, part; RRS s 8932, part. (ii) 1907 c 248 s 1, part; 1890 p 140 s 12, part; RRS s 8933, part.]